California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(1) A surcharge liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of surcharge liability is attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the surcharge reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported surcharge liability is attributable to one spouse.

(2) The other spouse establishes that the other spouse
 did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment.

(3) Taking into account whether the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in surcharge attributable to that understatement or nonpayment, then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for the surcharge, including interest, penalties, and other amounts, to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of the surcharge.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be
 made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar months, quarters, or years subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to a calendar month, quarter, or year that is more than five years from the final date on the department-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means whether a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section,
 with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a service supplier
 for each access line subscribed by service users or a sellers collection from each prepaid consumer’s purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services, or
 an access line or purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a service supplier, seller, or as a service user, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the department, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for an unpaid surcharge or deficiency, or any portion of either, attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the department may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 99.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Overpayments and Refunds [41100. - 41114.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [41100. - 41106.]

41100.

(a) If the department determines that any amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the department shall set forth that fact in the records of the department, certify the amount collected in excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom paid, and credit the excess amount collected or paid on any amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or their successors, administrators, or executors. Any
 determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(b) Any overpayment of
 a
 surcharge by a service user to a service supplier or by a prepaid consumer to a seller who is required to collect the surcharge shall be credited or refunded by the state to the service user. However, if the service supplier or seller has paid the amount to the department and establishes to the satisfaction of the department that it has not collected the amount from the service user or has refunded the amount to the service user, the overpayment may be credited or refunded by the state to the service supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 29.5.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 39 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

41101.

A refund shall not be approved by the department after three years from the last day of the second month following the close of the reporting period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 3 or 4 of Chapter 4 of this part, after six months from the date the determinations become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the department within that period. A credit shall not be approved by the department after the expiration of that period unless a claim for credit is filed with the department within that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 101.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41101.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 41101 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage the person’s financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person that can be expected to result in death or that has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and
 manner as the department may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation of rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 102.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41101.2.

Notwithstanding Section 41101, a refund of an overpayment of any surcharge, penalty, or interest collected by the department by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 103.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41101.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Sections 41101 and 41102 that is made in the case in which the amount of surcharges determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of surcharges determined”
 means an amount of
 surcharges,
 interest, or penalty, with respect to a single determination made under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 41080) of Chapter 4.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 30.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41102.

Every claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the claim is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41103.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of any demand against the state on account of overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41104.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part the department shall give notice of its action to the claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 104.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41105.

Interest shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of surcharges at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the first day of the calendar month following the month during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the person making the overpayment with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month following the date upon
 which the person making the overpayment, if the person has not already filed a claim, is notified by the department that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the department, whichever date is the earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the surcharge or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 31.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41106.

(a) If the department determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the department to defer action on the claim, the
 department, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the department to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 106.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cancellations [41107. - 41107.]

41107.

If any amount has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 62.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suit for Refund [41108. - 41114.]

41108.

No injunction, or writ of mandate, judgment of declaratory relief, or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against the state or against any officer of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41109.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41110.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the department’s action upon a claim filed pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, the claimant may bring an action against the department on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in any city or city and county of this state in which the Attorney General has an office for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 108.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41111.

If the department fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the department of its action on the claim, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the department on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 109.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41112.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any surcharge due and payable from the plaintiff. The balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41113.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 110.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41114.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the department to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person paying the amount or by any person other than the person who paid the amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 111.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [41114.1. - 41114.3.]

41114.1.

(a) The department may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the department
 may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any erroneous refund or credit, the department may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070) of Chapter 4. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the department within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 112.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41114.2.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41114.1, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

41114.3.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41114.1, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Collection of Tax [41115. - 41127.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. Suit for Tax [41115. - 41119.]

41115.

At any time within 10 years after any surcharge or any amount of surcharge required to be collected becomes due and payable, and at any time after any amount determined under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070), Article 4 (commencing with Section 41080) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 41085) of Chapter 4 of this part becomes due and payable, the department may bring an action in the courts of this state, of any other state, or of the United States in the name of the people of California to collect the amount delinquent together with penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 113.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41116.

The Attorney General shall prosecute the action, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41117.

In the action a writ of attachment may issue, and no affidavit previous to the issuing of the attachment is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

41118.

In the action, a certificate by the department showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the determination of the surcharges or the amount of surcharges, of the delinquency of the amounts set forth, and of the compliance by the department with all the provisions of this part in relation to the computation and determination of the amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 32.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41119.

In any action brought under this part, process may be served according to the Code of Civil Procedure and the Civil Code of this state or may be served upon any agent or clerk in this state employed by a service supplier or seller in a place of business maintained by the service supplier or seller in this state. In the latter case a copy of the process shall forthwith be sent by registered mail to the service supplier or seller at its principal or home office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 115.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notice to Withhold [41120. - 41123.6.]

41120.

If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid by that person or if a determination has been made against that person that remains unpaid, the department may, not later than five years after the payment became delinquent, give notice thereof personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the delinquent, or any person against whom a determination has been made that remains unpaid or owing any debts to the delinquent or that person. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the
 notice shall be given to that officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 116.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41121.

After receiving the notice the person so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the department consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 117.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41122.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the department of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank at which the deposit is
 carried or at which the credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 118.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41123.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld hereunder, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid he shall be liable to the state for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------

41123.5.

(a) The department may, by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons, other than a service supplier, having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a service user or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any surcharge, interest, or penalties due from the service user or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as
 provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the service user or other
 person liable for the surcharge.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the service user or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the service user and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by electronic transmission or other electronic technology to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 63.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41123.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the department determines upon receiving information from any person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for surcharges pursuant to Section 41123.5 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the department, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The department’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence furnished by the person liable for the
 surcharge.

(b) Upon its determination, the department shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the department within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the department upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a surcharge deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted
 amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the department on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the surcharge is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the
 department under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the department thereof.

(f) If under this section, an amount that was withheld and not remitted to the department is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the department on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 120.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Priority and Lien of Surcharge [41124. - 41124.1.]

41124.

The amounts required to be paid by any person under this part together with interest and penalties shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the person is insolvent.

(b) Whenever the person makes a voluntary assignment of his or her assets.

(c) Whenever the estate of the person in the hands of executors, administrators, or heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the deceased.

(d) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent person required to pay any amount under this part are levied upon by process of law.

This section does not give the state a preference over any lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code.

The preference given to the state by this section shall be subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

41124.1.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed on a return received by the
 department before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent.

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the department.

(3) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 121.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Warrant for Collection [41125. - 41127.]

41125.

At any time within five years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount required to be paid under this part the department or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 122.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41126.

The department shall pay the sheriff or marshal upon the completion of that person’s services pursuant to a warrant, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for that person’s services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The department, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 123.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41127.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous [41127.5. - 41127.9.]

41127.5.

The department shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the department a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 124.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41127.6.

(a) The department may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any surcharges due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the department and the taxpayer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the department, the department may terminate the agreement by mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of the
 person’s right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the surcharge, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The department shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of surcharges, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the department finds collection of the
 surcharge to be in jeopardy.

(e) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the date on which the department’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the department shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 41090.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 125.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41127.7.

The department, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 41127.6 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 126.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41127.8.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of surcharge, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the department’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the department. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the department has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other surcharge imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the department finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery
 fee shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a) shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other surcharge imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 127.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41127.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may
 provide service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 23.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Administration [41128. - 41176.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regulations, Records and Reports [41128. - 41133.4.]

41128.

The department shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The department shall not prescribe, adopt, or enforce any rule or regulation that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of altering the terms and conditions of service of a service supplier serving the general public, other than the imposition of the surcharges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 747, Sec. 33.   (AB 988)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41129.
